pt-BR: Lira/suporte de partitura local de montagem: Rack/grampo para equipamentos de bateria; Campana do instrumento; Tudel; Suporte para microfone; Área do receptor do bocal; Estante de partitura; Pompa de afinação; Universal/multiposição; Cápsula da válvula; Outro
en: Lyre/flip folder mounting location: Drum hardware rack/clamp; Instrument bell; Leadpipe; Mic stand; Mouthpiece receiver area; Music stand; Tuning slide; Universal/multi-position; Valve casing; Other
ko: 리라/플립 폴더 장착 위치: 드럼 하드웨어 랙/클램프; 악기 벨; 리드파이프; 마이크 스탠드; 마우스피스 리시버 부근; 보면대; 튜닝 슬라이드; 범용/다중 위치; 밸브 케이싱; 기타
ro-RO: Locația de montare a suportului metalic pentru partituri sau a suportului tip flip folder: Rack/clemă accesorii tobă; Pâlnia instrumentului; Tub principal; Stativ de microfon; Zona de prindere a muștiucului; Pupitru; Culisă de acordaj; Universal/multi-poziție; Carcasă pistoane; Altele
it: Posizione di montaggio della lira/portafogli: Morsetto/rack hardware batteria; Campana dello strumento; Cannello; Asta microfonica; Area del ricevitore del bocchino; Leggio; Pompa di intonazione; Universale/multiposizione; Corpo dei pistoni; Altro
zh-CN: 簧座或折叠架安装位置: 鼓架/夹具; 乐器喇叭口; 吹口管; 麦克风支架; 吹嘴接收器区域; 谱架; 调音管; 通用/多位置; 活塞外壳; 其他
pl: Miejsce montażu liry/flip folderu: Rama / zacisk perkusyjny; Czara głosowa instrumentu; Rurka ustnikowa; Statyw mikrofonowy; Okolice gniazda ustnika; Pulpit do nut; Krąglik strojeniowy; Uniwersalne / wielopozycyjne; Obudowa wentyli; Inne
tr: Lyre/flip aparatının montaj konumu: Bateri donanım rafı/kelepçesi; Enstrüman kalağı; Ana boru; Mikrofon standı; Ağızlık yuvası alanı; Nota sehpası; Akort sürgüsü; Evrensel/çok pozisyonlu; Valf gövdesi; Diğer
nb: Lyre-/flipmappens monteringsposisjon: Rack/klemme for trommeutstyr; Instrumentklokke; Munnrør; Mikrofonstativ; Munnstykkeinngang; Notestativ; Stemmebøyle; Universell / flere posisjoner; Ventilhus; Annet
sk-SK: Miesto upevnenia nôt alebo notového zápisu: Rampa/svorka na bicie; Ozvučník nástroja; Úsťová rúrka; Mikrofónový stojan; Priestor prijímača nátrubka; Notový stojan; Ladiaci ťah; Univerzálne/viacpolohové; Puzdro ventilu; Iné
cs: Místo upevnění Lyre/flip folderu: Stojan/svorka pro bicí; Ozvučník nástroje; Hlavní trubice (leadpipe); Stojan na mikrofon; Oblast úchytu náustku; Notový stojan; Ladicí snížec; Univerzální/vícepolohové; Pouzdro ventilu; Jiné
zh-TW: 譜夾/翻頁譜夾安裝位置: 鼓硬體支架/夾具; 樂器喇叭口; 吹管; 麥克風架; 吹嘴接收區; 譜架; 調音管; 通用/多位置; 按鍵套管; 其他
de: Montageposition der Lyra/des Flipfolders: Trommel-Hardware-Rack/Klemme; Schallbecher; Mundrohr; Mikrofonständer; Mundstückaufnahme; Notenständer; Stimmzug; Universell/Multiposition; Ventilgehäuse; Sonstige
vi: Vị trí gắn giá đỡ/thư mục lật: Giá treo/kẹp phụ kiện trống; Loa nhạc cụ; Ống thổi; Chân đế micro; Khu vực tiếp nhận búp kèn; Giá để bản nhạc; Thanh trượt chỉnh âm; Đa năng/nhiều vị trí; Vỏ van; Khác
bg-BG: Място за монтаж на папка с лира/отваряща се: Стойка/скоба за хардуер на барабан; Камбана на инструмента; Мундщукова тръба; Стойка за микрофон; Зона на гнездото на мундщука; Стойка за ноти; Тръба за настройка; Универсално/многопозиционно; Корпус на клапаните; Други
sl-SI: Mesto montaže liričnega držala/preklopne mape: Stojalo/sponka za bobne; Odmevnik instrumenta; Ustnična cev; Stojalo za mikrofon; Območje za namestitev ustnika; Stojalo za note; Uglasitveni poteg; Univerzalno/večpoložajno; Ohišje ventilov; Drugo
nl: Lyra/flipfolder bevestigingslocatie: Drumhardware-rack/klem; Instrumentbeker; Leadpipe; Microfoonstandaard; Mondstukhouder-gebied; Muziekstandaard; Stempomp; Universeel/meerdere posities; Ventielhuis; Anders
ru: Место крепления лиры и флип-папки: Рама/крепление для барабанов; Раструб инструмента; Мундштучная трубка; Микрофонная стойка; Область крепления мундштука; Пюпитр; Крон настройки; Универсальное / многопозиционное; Корпус вентиля; Другое
pt-PT: Ponto de fixação de mola lira/viragem de página: Rack/grampo de equipamento de bateria; Campânula do instrumento; Tubo de bocal; Suporte de microfone; Área do recetor do bocal; Estante de partituras; Bomba de afinação; Universal/multiposição; Camisa do pistão; Outro
da: Monteringsplacering til lyre/flipfolder: Tromme-hardware-stativ/klemme; Instrumentets klangstykke; Mundrør; Mikrofonstativ; Område ved mundstykke; Nodestativ; Stemmetræk; Universal/flere positioner; Ventilhus; Andet
hu: Líra/kottatartó rögzítési helye: Dobállvány/bilincs; Hangszer tölcsére; Fúvókacső; Mikrofonállvány; Fúvókabefogó rész; Kottaállvány; Hangolócső; Univerzális/több pozíciós; Szelepház; Egyéb
ja: リラ/フリップフォルダー取り付け位置: ドラムハードウェアラック/クランプ; 楽器のベル; マウスパイプ; マイクスタンド; マウスピースレシーバー付近; 譜面台; チューニングスライド; ユニバーサル/マルチポジション; バルブケーシング; その他
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης αναλόγιου/θήκης σημειώσεων: Βάση/σφιγκτήρας εξοπλισμού ντραμς; Καμπάνα οργάνου; Κύριος σωλήνας; Βάση μικροφώνου; Περιοχή υποδοχής επιστομίου; Αναλόγιο; Σωλήνας κουρδίσματος; Γενικής χρήσης/πολλαπλών θέσεων; Περίβλημα βαλβίδας; Άλλο
sv: Monteringsplats för lyra/vikfolder: Rack/klämma för trumutrustning; Klockstycke; Munrör; Mikrofonstativ; Munstyckesfäste; Notställ; Stämbygel; Universell/multiställning; Ventilhus; Annat
fr: Emplacement de fixation de la lyre ou du porte-partitions: Rack / pince pour matériel de batterie; Pavillon de l’instrument; Branche d’embouchure; Pied de micro; Zone du récepteur d’embouchure; Pupitre; Coulisse d’accord; Universel / multiposition; Bloc pistons; Autre
lt-LT: Lyrės / natų laikiklio montavimo vieta: Būgnų techninės įrangos stovas / gnybtas; Instrumento žiotys; Pūtimo vamzdelis; Mikrofono stovas; Kandiklio tvirtinimo sritis; Natų pultas; Derinimo slankiklis; Universalus / kelios padėtys; Vožtuvo korpusas; Kita
fi: Lyyra-/selailukansion kiinnityssijainti: Rumpuräkki/-puristin; Soittimen kello; Suora putki; Mikrofoniteline; Suukappaleen kiinnityskohta; Nuottiteline; Viritysputki; Yleiskäyttöinen/moniasentoinen; Venttiilikoneisto; Muu
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งโฟลเดอร์ Lyre/flip: แร็คฮาร์ดแวร์กลอง/แคลมป์; ปากแตรเครื่องดนตรี; ท่อนำเสียง; ขาตั้งไมค์; บริเวณตัวรับปากเป่า; ขาตั้งโน้ตเพลง; ท่อปรับเทียบเสียง; อเนกประสงค์/หลายตำแหน่ง; ปลอกวาล์ว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Mjesto za montažu mape Lyre/flip: Stalak / stezaljka na bubnju; Zvono instrumenta; Usna cijev (leadpipe); Stalak za mikrofon; Područje prihvata usnika; Stalak za note; Cijev za ugađanje; Univerzalno / više položaja; Kućište ventila; Ostalo
es: Ubicación de montaje de la lira/porta partituras abatible: Rack/abrazadera de hardware de batería; Campana del instrumento; Tudel; Soporte de micrófono; Área del receptor de la boquilla; Atril; Bomba de afinación; Universal/multiposición; Carcasa de válvulas; Otro